Utah statutes.
16-4-202.   Procedure for assessment in absence of provisions in articles or bylaws.

(1)  An assessment shall be levied in the manner this chapter provides, unless other commercially reasonable procedures are provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(2)  Each assessment shall comply with the requirements of Section 16-4-203.



Enacted by Chapter 367, 2007 General Session

